New Jersey, session 222, A2733.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  The emergency department of a general hospital licensed pursuant to P.L.1971, c.136 (C.26:2H-1 et seq.) shall provide each parent or guardian of a child, who presents to the emergency department experiencing a mental health crisis, with information about care management organizations, which information shall include, but not limited to, contact information for nearby local care management organizations. b.  As used in this section, Care management organization means a county-based, nonprofit organization that provides face-to-face care management for youth with complex needs and their families. 2.  This act shall take effect 90 days after the date of enactment.